Florida, session 2026, HB1351.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (5) of section 409.903, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
409.903 Mandatory payments for eligible persons.—The
agency shall make payments for medical assistance and related
services on behalf of the following persons who the department,
or the Social Security Administration by contract with the
Department of Children and Families, determines to be eligible,
subject to the income, assets, and categorical eligibility tests
set forth in federal and state law. Payment on behalf of these
Medicaid eligible persons is subject to the availability of
moneys and any limitations established by the General
Appropriations Act or chapter 216.
(5) A pregnant woman for the duration of her pregnancy and
for the postpartum period consisting of the 12-month period
beginning on the last day of her pregnancy, or a child under age
1, if either is living in a family that has an income that is at
or below 185 percent of the most current federal poverty level.
Such a person is not subject to an assets test. Further, a
pregnant woman who applies for eligibility for the Medicaid
program through a qualified Medicaid provider must be offered
the opportunity, subject to federal rules, to be made
presumptively eligible for the Medicaid program.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1351-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1351 2026
(a) Qualified Medicaid providers that may conduct
presumptive eligibility determinations for Medicaid for pregnant
women include, but are not limited to, hospitals participating
in the Medicaid program; federally qualified health centers;
birth centers; nonprofit maternal and child health
organizations, such as healthy start coalitions; clinics
operating under the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for
Women, Infants, and Children; and local housing authorities,
provided such entities have met the applicable training and
certification standards established by the department for such
purpose. The department shall ensure such providers are
adequately trained and monitored for compliance with federal and
state requirements relating to presumptive eligibility
determinations.
(b) For pregnant women deemed presumptively eligible under
this subsection, the agency shall provide such coverage under
the Medicaid program for the maximum period allowable under
federal law or until a full Medicaid eligibility determination
is made, whichever occurs earlier.
(c) Pregnant women deemed presumptively eligible under
this subsection are entitled to coverage of all medically
necessary services under the Medicaid program, including, but
not limited to, services provided by specialists and
subspecialists needed to comanage high-risk pregnancies,
including for issues outside the scope of general obstetrics.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1351-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1351 2026
All prior authorization approvals granted before or during the
presumptive eligibility period remain valid for the duration of
such period to ensure continuity of care and to reduce the risk
of adverse maternal or infant health outcomes.
Section 2. Within 60 days after this act becomes a law,
the Agency for Health Care Administration shall seek federal
approval to extend the allowable period of presumptive Medicaid
eligibility for pregnant women to 180 days under s. 409.903,
Florida Statutes, and the agency and the Department of Children
and Families, as applicable, shall initiate any necessary
rulemaking to implement the amendments made by this act to s.
409.903, Florida Statutes.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1351-00